Massachusetts, session 194th, H5161.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 25 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by adding the following section:- 
Section 24. Public Hearing and Comment Period for Department of Public Utilities Rate 
Changes 
(a) The Department of Public Utilities shall be required to hold at least one public hearing 
and a 30-day public comment period before approving any rate increase, including changes to 
delivery fees or other charges. 
(b) The department shall provide notice of such hearings in a manner that ensures 
accessibility, including publication on the department’s website, written notifications to affected 
municipalities, and public service announcements. 

of 4 11  SECTION 2. Chapter 164 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by adding the following section:- 
Section 149. Rate and Delivery Fee Increase Cap 
(a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, no investor-owned electric 
or gas distribution company shall increase delivery fees or rates by more than 3 percent per year, 
adjusted annually based on the Consumer Price Index for the Northeast region, as determined by 
the Bureau of Labor Statistics. 
(b) The department shall adopt regulations necessary to implement this section, including 
provisions ensuring transparency in rate adjustments and consumer notifications. 
SECTION 3. Said chapter of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
adding the following section:- 
Section 150. Veteran Utility Rate Reduction Program 
(a) The department shall establish a Veteran Utility Rate Reduction Program that expands 
upon the existing tiered rate structure, specifically targeting veterans, as defined by section 1 of 
chapter 115, and those receiving VA disability compensation. 
(b) The department shall ensure that eligible veterans receive utility delivery fee 
discounts contingent upon and aligned with the existing tiered low-income discount structure as 
established by the department, with veterans qualifying for equivalent or greater benefits under 
the same income thresholds. 
(c) The department shall promulgate regulations necessary for the implementation of this 
section, ensuring that verification of eligibility for the veteran discount aligns with existing 

of 4 32 procedures for income-based discounts, utilizing VA records and other appropriate 
documentation. The department shall also conduct outreach efforts to maximize veteran 
participation in the program 
SECTION 4. Said chapter of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
adding the following section:- 
Section 151. Senior Utility Rate Reduction Program 
The department shall establish a utility rate reduction program for residents of the 
commonwealth aged 65 and older to provide discounted utility delivery fees. The department 
shall promulgate regulations to determine eligibility criteria, discount rates, and ensure 
streamlined implementation. 
SECTION 5. Chapter 239 of the Acts of 2024 is hereby amended by striking out sections 
4, 5, 10, 11, 16, 17, and 98. 
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall be a 
special commission to study and recommend reforms to utility delivery fee structures, industry 
best practices, and cost-reduction measures for consumers in the Commonwealth. The 
commission shall analyze the impact of delivery fees on ratepayers, identify the primary cost 
drivers, and evaluate regulatory or market-based strategies to mitigate excessive charges while 
ensuring reliable service. The commission shall assess the impact of delivery fees on consumer 
costs, market competition, and energy affordability through a review of historical rate structures, 
policy comparisons with other states, stakeholder input, and financial modeling to identify 
potential reforms that could reduce costs while maintaining reliable service. Additionally, the 
commission shall review the effectiveness of existing regulations governing delivery fees and 

of 4 54 identify potential legislative or administrative adjustments to enhance pricing transparency and 
efficiency. The commission shall consist of the House and Senate chairs of the Joint Committee 
on Telecommunications, Utilities, and Energy, who shall serve as co-chairs; the Speaker of the 
House of Representatives or a designee; the President of the Senate or a designee; the House 
Minority Leader or a designee; the Senate Minority Leader or a designee; the Chair of the 
Department of Public Utilities or a designee; the Attorney General or a designee; one 
representative from the Massachusetts Municipal Association; one representative from the 
Massachusetts Competitive Energy Suppliers Association; and two individuals with expertise in 
utility regulation, energy pricing, or economic analysis to be appointed by the Governor. The 
commission shall hold no fewer than four public hearings to solicit input from stakeholders, 
including consumer advocacy groups, industry representatives, and regulatory agencies. The 
commission shall submit a report detailing its findings and recommendations, including any 
proposed legislation, to the House and Senate Committees on Ways and Means, the Joint 
Committee on Telecommunications, Utilities, and Energy, and the Clerks of the House of 
Representatives and Senate no later than twelve months after the passage of this legislation.